cs: Obsah balení vodní rakety: Nástroje na sestavení; Křidélka; Ruční pumpa; Návod k použití; Odpalovací zařízení / rampa; Špička; Sada trysek / adaptéry; Padák; Tlakoměr; Návratová stuha; Vypouštěcí ventil; Náhradní těsnění / O-kroužky; Tělo rakety / láhev; Jiné
vi: Bộ mặt hàng tên lửa nước; mục bao gồm: Dụng cụ lắp ráp; Cánh vây; Bơm tay; Sổ tay hướng dẫn; Bệ phóng; Mũi chóp; Bộ vòi phun/đầu chuyển đổi; Dù; Đồng hồ đo áp suất; Dải ruy băng thu hồi; Van xả; Gioăng/vòng chữ O thay thế; Thân tên lửa/thân chai; Khác
fr: Éléments inclus dans le kit de fusée à eau: Outils de montage; Ailerons; Pompe manuelle; Manuel d’instructions; Lanceur/Aire de lancement; Coiffe; Jeu de buses/adaptateurs; Parachute; Manomètre; Ruban de récupération; Soupape de décharge; Joints de rechange/Joints toriques; Corps de la fusée/bouteille; Autre
hu: Vízirakéta-készlet tartozékai: Összeszerelő szerszámok; Vezérsíkok; Kézi pumpa; Használati útmutató; Kilövő-/indítóállás; Orrkúp; Fúvókakészlet/adapterek; Ejtőernyő; Nyomásmérő; Visszatérő szalag; Kieresztőszelep; Póttömítések/O-gyűrűk; Rakétatest/palack; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključeni elementi kompleta za vodene rakete: Alati za sastavljanje; Krilca; Ručna pumpa; Priručnik s uputama; Lanser / lansirna rampa; Vrh rakete; Komplet mlaznica / adapteri; Padobran; Manometar; Traka za spuštanje; Ispusni ventil; Zamjenske brtve / O-prstenovi; Tijelo rakete / boca; Ostalo
tr: Dahil olan su roketi kit ürünleri: Montaj araçları; Kanatçıklar; El pompası; Kullanım kılavuzu; Fırlatıcı/fırlatma rampası; Burun konisi; Nozül seti/adaptörler; Paraşüt; Basınç göstergesi; Kurtarma şeridi; Tahliye valfi; Yedek contalar/O-ringler; Roket gövdesi/şişe; Diğer
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплекта водна ракета: Инструменти за сглобяване; Стабилизатори / Перки; Ръчна помпа; Ръководство за употреба; Стартово устройство/площадка; Носов конус; Комплект дюзи/адаптери; Парашут; Манометър; Лента за приземяване; Изпускателен клапан; Резервни уплътнения/О-пръстени; Тяло на ракетата/бутилка; Други
ko: 물 로켓 키트 포함 품목: 조립 도구; 핀; 핸드 펌프; 사용 설명서; 런처/발사대; 노즈콘; 노즐 세트/어댑터; 낙하산; 압력계; 리커버리 스트리머; 릴리스 밸브; 교체용 실/O링; 로켓 본체/병; 기타
sv: Medföljande delar i vattenraketssats: Monteringsverktyg; Fenor; Handpump; Bruksanvisning; Avfyrningsramp/startplatta; Noskon; Munstyckesset/adaptrar; Fallskärm; Tryckmätare; Återhämtningsband; Säkerhetsventil; Ersättningstätningar/O-ringar; Raketkropp/flaska; Övrigt
pt-BR: Kit de foguete de água itens incluídos: Ferramentas de montagem; Aletas; Bomba manual; Manual de instruções; Lançador/base de lançamento; Ogiva; Conjunto de bocais/adaptadores; Paraquedas; Manômetro; Fita de recuperação; Válvula de liberação; Anéis de vedação/O-rings de reposição; Corpo do foguete/garrafa; Outros
it: Articoli inclusi nel kit del razzo ad acqua: Strumenti di montaggio; Alette; Pompa a mano; Manuale di istruzioni; Lanciatore/rampa di lancio; Ogiva; Set ugelli/adattatori; Paracadute; Manometro; Nastro di recupero; Valvola di rilascio; Guarnizioni/O-ring di ricambio; Corpo del razzo/bottiglia; Altro
zh-TW: 包含水火箭套件品項: 組裝工具; 尾翼; 手動打氣筒; 說明書; 發射器/發射台; 鼻錐; 噴嘴組/轉接器; 降落傘; 壓力計; 回收彩帶; 排氣閥; 替換密封墊/O 型環; 火箭主體/水瓶; 其他
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no kit de foguetão aquático: Ferramentas de montagem; Aletas; Bomba manual; Manual de instruções; Lançador/plataforma de lançamento; Ogiva; Conjunto de bicos/adaptadores; Paraquedas; Manómetro; Fita de recuperação; Válvula de libertação; Vedantes/O-rings de substituição; Corpo/garrafa do foguetão; Outro
nl: Waterraket items inbegrepen: Montagegereedschap; Vinnen; Handpomp; Handleiding; Lanceerder/lanceerplatform; Neuskegel; Spuitmondenset/adapters; Parachute; Manometer; Bergingswimpel; Ontluchtingsventiel; Vervangende afdichtingen/O-ringen; Raketbehuizing/fles; Overige
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu rakiety wodnej: Narzędzia montażowe; Stateczniki; Pompka ręczna; Instrukcja obsługi; Wyrzutnia/platforma startowa; Głowica; Zestaw dysz/adapterów; Spadochron; Manometr; Taśma hamująca; Zawór zwalniający; Zapasowe uszczelki/o-ringi; Korpus rakiety/butelka; Inne
en: Water rocket kit items included: Assembly tools; Fins; Hand pump; Instruction manual; Launcher/launch pad; Nose cone; Nozzle set/adapters; Parachute; Pressure gauge; Recovery streamer; Release valve; Replacement seals/O-rings; Rocket body/bottle; Other
es: Artículos incluidos en el kit de cohete de agua: Herramientas de montaje; Aletas; Bomba manual; Manual de instrucciones; Lanzador/plataforma de lanzamiento; Cono de ojiva; Juego de boquillas/adaptadores; Paracaídas; Manómetro; Cinta de recuperación; Válvula de escape; Sellos de repuesto/juntas tóricas; Cuerpo del cohete/botella; Otro
fi: Vesirakettipakkaukseen kuuluvat tuotteet: Kokoamistyökalut; Evät; Käsipumppu; Käyttöohje; Laukaisin / laukaisualusta; Kärkikartio; Suutinsarja/adapterit; Laskuvarjo; Painemittari; Palautusnauha; Vapautusventtiili; Vaihtotiivisteet / O-renkaat; Raketin runko / pullo; Muu
el: Περιλαμβάνεται κιτ υδροπυραύλου: Εργαλεία συναρμολόγησης; Πτερύγια; Τρόμπα χειρός; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Εκτοξευτής/βάση εκτόξευσης; Κώνος ρύγχους; Σετ ακροφυσίων/αντάπτορες; Αλεξίπτωτο; Μανόμετρο; Κορδέλα ανάκτησης; Βαλβίδα απελευθέρωσης; Ανταλλακτικά στεγανοποιητικά/δακτύλιοι O; Σώμα πυραύλου/μπουκάλι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vključeni predmeti v kompletu vodne rakete: Orodja za sestavljanje; Krilca; Ročna črpalka; Navodila za uporabo; Izstreljevalnik/izstrelitvena ploščad; Nosni stožec; Komplet šob/adapterji; Padalo; Merilnik tlaka; Trak za varno vrnitev; Varnostni ventil; Nadomestna tesnila/O-obročki; Trup rakete/steklenica; Drugo
sk-SK: Vrátane položiek súpravy vodnej rakety: Montážne nástroje; Krídelká; Ručná pumpa; Návod na použitie; Odpaľovacie zariadenie/rampa; Hlavica; Súprava dýz/adaptérov; Padák; Tlakomer; Návratová stuha; Vypúšťací ventil; Náhradné tesnenia/O-krúžky; Telo rakety/fľaša; Iné
ja: 水ロケットキット付属品: 組み立てツール; フィン; ハンドポンプ; 取扱説明書; ランチャー/発射台; ノーズコーン; ノズルセット/アダプター; パラシュート; 圧力計; 回収用ストリーマー; リリースバルブ; 交換用シール/Oリング; ロケット本体/ボトル; その他
nb: Innhold i vannrakettsettet: Monteringsverktøy; Finner; Håndpumpe; Bruksanvisning; Utskytningsrampe; Nesekjegle; Dysesett/adaptere; Fallskjerm; Trykkmåler; Vimpel; Utløserventil; Ekstra tetninger / O-ringer; Rakettkropp/flaske; Annet
lt-LT: Įtraukti vandens raketų rinkinio elementai: Surinkimo įrankiai; Sparneliai; Rankinė pompa; Naudojimo instrukcija; Paleidimo įrenginys / paleidimo aikštelė; Nosies kūgis; Antgalių rinkinys / adapteriai; Parašiutas; Slėgio matuoklis; Nusileidimo juosta; Išleidimo vožtuvas; Atsarginiai sandarikliai / O formos žiedai; Raketos korpusas / butelis; Kita
ru: Комплект водяной ракеты: Инструменты для сборки; Стабилизаторы; Ручной насос; Руководство по эксплуатации; Пусковая установка/платформа; Носовой обтекатель; Набор сопел/адаптеров; Парашют; Манометр; Тормозная лента (стример); Выпускной клапан; Запасные уплотнители/уплотнительные кольца; Корпус ракеты/бутылка; Другое
ro-RO: Articole incluse în kitul rachetei cu apă: Unelte de asamblare; Aripioare; Pompă manuală; Manual de instrucțiuni; Lansator/platformă de lansare; Con frontal; Set de duze/adaptoare; Parașută; Manometru; Panglică de recuperare; Supapă de eliberare; Garnituri de schimb/inele O; Corp rachetă/sticlă; Altele
th: อุปกรณ์ชุดจรวดน้ำประกอบด้วย: เครื่องมือประกอบ; ครีบ; ปั๊มมือ; คู่มือการใช้งาน; เครื่องยิง/ฐานยิง; กรวยหัวจรวด; ชุดหัวฉีด/อะแดปเตอร์; ร่มชูชีพ; เกจวัดความดัน; สายริบบิ้น; วาล์วระบาย; ซีล/โอริงสำรอง; ตัวจรวด/ขวด; อื่นๆ
da: Medfølgende dele i vandraketsæt: Monteringsværktøj; Finner; Håndpumpe; Brugermanual; Affyringsrampe; Næsekegle; Dysesæt/adaptere; Faldskærm; Trykmåler; Bånd (streamer); Udløsningsventil; Udskiftningstætninger/O-ringe; Raketkrop/flaske; Andet
zh-CN: 包括水火箭套件部件: 组装工具; 尾翼; 手动气泵; 说明书; 发射器/发射台; 头锥; 喷嘴组/适配器; 降落伞; 气压计; 回收飘带; 释放阀; 替换密封件/O 形圈; 火箭弹体/水瓶; 其他
de: Enthaltene Teile des Wasserraketen-Sets: Montagewerkzeuge; Finnen; Handpumpe; Bedienungsanleitung; Abschussrampe/Startplatz; Raketenspitze; Düsenset/Adapter; Fallschirm; Manometer; Bergungsband; Ablassventil; Ersatzdichtungen/O-Ringe; Raketenkörper/Flasche; Sonstige